Wisconsin, session 2025, AB978.
do enact as follows:AB978,11Section 1. 20.370 (9) (hv) of the statutes is amended to read:AB978,2,5220.370 (9) (hv) Fee amounts for statewide automated issuing system. All 3moneys received from the deductions made under ss. 23.176 (4) (d), 23.47 (3) (e), 4and 29.024 (6) (ag) to be used for payments to a person contracted under ss. 23.176 5(3) (f) 3., 23.47 (3) (c), and 29.024 (6) (a) 4. as required by the contract.AB978,26Section 2. 23.176 of the statutes is created to read:AB978,2,7723.176 Hiking permit. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB978,2,108(a) “Proof” means the original hiking permit issued by the department or an 9agent appointed under sub. (3) (f) 2. or any alternative form of proof designated by 10rule under s. 23.47 (1).AB978,2,1111(b) “Vehicle admission area” has the meaning given in s. 27.01 (7) (a) 3.AB978,3,612(2) Permit required. (a) Except as provided under par. (c), no person may 13travel by foot on a groomed hiking trail on land owned by the state, excluding a 14vehicle admission area, unless the department or an agent appointed under sub. (3) 1(f) 2. has issued to the person a hiking permit. A person shall carry proof of the 2hiking permit at all times while the person travels by foot on a groomed hiking trail 3on land owned by the state, unless otherwise required by this chapter or unless 4otherwise authorized or required by an agent of the state. The person shall exhibit 5the proof to the department or its wardens or other law enforcement officers on 6demand.AB978,3,87(b) A hiking permit issued under this section does not authorize a person to 8hike in an area on land owned by the state where hiking is prohibited.AB978,3,119(c) A person is not prohibited from traveling by foot on a groomed hiking trail 10on land owned by the state without a hiking permit under par. (a) if any of the 11following apply:AB978,3,13121. Doing so is incidental to another activity that the person is authorized to do 13under an approval or registration issued by the department.AB978,3,15142. The person is authorized to do so on a state trail under a trail pass issued 15by the department under s. 23.175.AB978,3,17163. The person is authorized to do so as part of an organized and authorized 17event.AB978,3,2318(3) Issuance. (a) The department shall issue a hiking permit to a person 19who applies for the permit and who pays the fees required under sub. (4). The 20application for a hiking permit shall be on the form and contain the information 21required by the department. The department or an agent appointed under par. (f) 222. may not issue a hiking permit to the applicant until the applicant complies with 23the requirements specified in this paragraph.AB978,4,21(b) A hiking permit issued under this section is valid for the calendar year in 2which it is issued.AB978,4,43(c) Each hiking permit issued under this section shall contain the name and 4address of the permit holder and other information required by the department.AB978,4,65(d) The department shall prepare, procure the printing of, and supply all 6necessary forms for applications and hiking permits issued under this section.AB978,4,87(e) The department may issue customer identification numbers as part of a 8statewide automated system for issuing permits under par. (f) 3.AB978,4,109(f) In the course of issuing permits under this section, the department may do 10any of the following:AB978,4,11111. Directly issue the permits.AB978,4,13122. Appoint persons who are not employees of the department to issue the 13permits as agents of the department.AB978,4,15143. Contract with persons who are not employees of the department to operate 15a statewide automated system for issuing permits.AB978,4,1716(g) The department may promulgate rules regulating the activities of persons 17who are authorized as agents under par. (f) 2.AB978,4,1918(4) Fees. (a) A person who applies for a hiking permit under this section 19shall pay one of the following fees to the department, whichever is applicable:AB978,4,20201. For an adult, $20.AB978,4,21212. For a child 12 years of age or older, $10.AB978,4,22223. For a child under the age of 12, $0.AB978,5,423(b) Any person, including the department, that issues a hiking permit under 24this section shall collect, in addition to the applicable fee under par. (a), an issuing 1fee of 75 cents for each permit issued to a person 12 years of age or older. An agent 2appointed under sub. (3) (f) 2. may retain 50 cents of each issuing fee for each 3permit. Any issuing fee collected by an employee of the department shall be 4remitted to the department together with the fee under par. (a).AB978,5,95(c) If the department enters into a contract under sub. (3) (f) 3., the 6department may deduct a portion of each fee collected under pars. (a) and (b) for 7payment to persons contracted to operate the statewide automated system under 8sub. (3) (f) 3. The department shall credit all of the amounts deducted to the 9appropriation account under s. 20.370 (9) (hv).AB978,5,1710(d) The department shall establish a system under which the department 11pays each agent appointed under sub. (3) (f) 2. a payment of 50 cents for each time 12that the agent processes a transaction through the statewide automated system 13contracted for under sub. (3) (f) 3. The payment under this paragraph is in addition 14to any issuing fee retained by the agent under par. (b). The department shall make 15the payments under this paragraph by allowing the agent to retain an amount 16equal to the payments from the amounts that are collected by the agent and that 17would otherwise be remitted to the department.AB978,318Section 3. 23.47 (1) (e) of the statutes is created to read:AB978,5,191923.47 (1) (e) A hiking permit under s. 23.176.AB978,420Section 4. 23.47 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB978,6,52123.47 (2) Electronic retrieval of information. If the department 22maintains a system under which the department stores information in an electronic 23format that relates to individuals who have been issued approvals under ch. 29, 24hiking permits under s. 23.176, or safety certificates under s. 23.33, 23.335, 30.74, 1or 350.055, the department may issue a conservation card to any individual who 2applies for the card for purposes of enabling the department to access information 3about that individual in the system. The department may authorize an individual 4to carry a conservation card or another form of identification, determined by the 5department, in lieu of carrying proof under sub. (1).AB978,6,66